Illinois, session 104th, SB1314.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Tobacco Products Tax Act of 1995 is amended 5by changing Sections 10-5, 10-10, 10-25, 10-30, 10-35, 10-37, 610-38, 10-45, and 10-50 and by adding Section 10-24 as 7follows: 8    (35 ILCS 143/10-5)9    Sec. 10-5. Definitions. For purposes of this Act:10    "Actual cost" means the actual price paid for each 11individual SKU by a distributor or a remote retail seller 12before any stated discounts or rebates.13    "Actual cost list" means the average actual price paid for 14a SKU by a distributor or a remote retail seller, before any 15stated discounts or rebates, to a manufacturer, wholesaler, or 16distributor during the calendar year immediately preceding the 17calendar year in which the sale occurs. 18    "Business" means any trade, occupation, activity, or 19enterprise engaged in, at any location whatsoever, for the 20purpose of selling tobacco products.21    "Cigar" means any roll of tobacco wrapped in leaf tobacco 22or in any substance containing tobacco. "Cigar" does not 23include a little cigar or any roll of tobacco that is   SB1314- 2 -LRB104 07123 HLH 17160 b1classified as a cigarette within the meaning of Section 1 of 2the Cigarette Tax Act. 3    "Cigarette" has the meaning ascribed to the term in 4Section 1 of the Cigarette Tax Act.5    "Contraband little cigar" means: 6        (1) packages of little cigars containing 20 or 25 7    little cigars that do not bear a required tax stamp under 8    this Act; 9        (2) packages of little cigars containing 20 or 25 10    little cigars that bear a fraudulent, imitation, or 11    counterfeit tax stamp; 12        (3) packages of little cigars containing 20 or 25 13    little cigars that are improperly tax stamped, including 14    packages of little cigars that bear only a tax stamp of 15    another state or taxing jurisdiction; or 16        (4) packages of little cigars containing other than 20 17    or 25 little cigars in the possession of a distributor, 18    retailer or wholesaler, unless the distributor, retailer, 19    or wholesaler possesses, or produces within the time frame 20    provided in Section 10-27 or 10-28 of this Act, an invoice 21    from a stamping distributor, distributor, or wholesaler 22    showing that the tax on the packages has been or will be 23    paid. 24    "Consumer" means a person who acquires ownership of 25tangible personal property, including tobacco products, for 26use or consumption in this State and not for resale.   SB1314- 3 -LRB104 07123 HLH 17160 b1    "Correctional Industries program" means a program run by a 2State penal institution in which residents of the penal 3institution produce tobacco products for sale to persons 4incarcerated in penal institutions or resident patients of a 5State operated mental health facility.6    "Department" means the Illinois Department of Revenue.7    "Distributor" means any of the following:8        (1) Any manufacturer or wholesaler in this State 9    engaged in the business of selling tobacco products who 10    sells, exchanges, or distributes tobacco products to 11    retailers or consumers in this State.12        (2) Any manufacturer or wholesaler engaged in the 13    business of selling tobacco products from without this 14    State who sells, exchanges, distributes, ships, or 15    transports tobacco products to retailers or consumers 16    located in this State, so long as that manufacturer or 17    wholesaler has or maintains within this State, directly or 18    by subsidiary, an office, sales house, or other place of 19    business, or any agent or other representative operating 20    within this State under the authority of the person or 21    subsidiary, irrespective of whether the place of business 22    or agent or other representative is located here 23    permanently or temporarily.24        (3) Any retailer who receives tobacco products on 25    which the tax has not been or will not be paid by another 26    distributor.  SB1314- 4 -LRB104 07123 HLH 17160 b1    "Distributor" does not include any person, wherever 2resident or located, who makes, manufactures, or fabricates 3tobacco products as part of a Correctional Industries program 4for sale to residents incarcerated in penal institutions or 5resident patients of a State operated mental health facility.6    "Electronic cigarette" means:7        (1) any device that employs a battery or other 8    mechanism to heat a solution or substance to produce a 9    vapor or aerosol intended for inhalation, except for (A) 10    any device designed solely for use with cannabis that 11    contains a statement on the retail packaging that the 12    device is designed solely for use with cannabis and not 13    for use with tobacco or (B) any device that contains a 14    solution or substance that contains cannabis subject to 15    tax under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 16    Program Act or the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act;17        (2) any cartridge or container of a solution or 18    substance intended to be used with or in the device or to 19    refill the device, except for any cartridge or container 20    of a solution or substance that contains cannabis subject 21    to tax under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 22    Program Act or the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act; or23        (3) any solution or substance, whether or not it 24    contains nicotine, intended for use in the device, except 25    for any solution or substance that contains cannabis 26    subject to tax under the Compassionate Use of Medical   SB1314- 5 -LRB104 07123 HLH 17160 b1    Cannabis Program Act or the Cannabis Regulation and Tax 2    Act.3    The changes made to the definition of "electronic 4cigarette" by this amendatory Act of the 102nd General 5Assembly apply on and after June 28, 2019, but no claim for 6credit or refund is allowed on or after the effective date of 7this amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly for such 8taxes paid during the period beginning June 28, 2019 and the 9effective date of this amendatory Act of the 102nd General 10Assembly.11    "Electronic cigarette" includes, but is not limited to, 12any electronic nicotine delivery system, electronic cigar, 13electronic cigarillo, electronic pipe, electronic hookah, vape 14pen, or similar product or device, and any component or part 15that can be used to build the product or device. "Electronic 16cigarette" does not include: cigarettes, as defined in Section 171 of the Cigarette Tax Act; any product approved by the United 18States Food and Drug Administration for sale as a tobacco 19cessation product, a tobacco dependence product, or for other 20medical purposes that is marketed and sold solely for that 21approved purpose; any asthma inhaler prescribed by a physician 22for that condition that is marketed and sold solely for that 23approved purpose; or any therapeutic product approved for use 24under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Program Act. 25    "Little cigar" means and includes any roll, made wholly or 26in part of tobacco, where such roll has an integrated   SB1314- 6 -LRB104 07123 HLH 17160 b1cellulose acetate filter and weighs less than 4 pounds per 2thousand and the wrapper or cover of which is made in whole or 3in part of tobacco. 4    "Manufacturer" means any person, wherever resident or 5located, who manufactures and sells tobacco products, except a 6person who makes, manufactures, or fabricates tobacco products 7as a part of a Correctional Industries program for sale to 8persons incarcerated in penal institutions or resident 9patients of a State operated mental health facility.10    Beginning on January 1, 2013, "moist snuff" means any 11finely cut, ground, or powdered tobacco that is not intended 12to be smoked, but shall not include any finely cut, ground, or 13powdered tobacco that is intended to be placed in the nasal 14cavity. 15    "Person" means any natural individual, firm, partnership, 16association, joint stock company, joint venture, limited 17liability company, or public or private corporation, however 18formed, or a receiver, executor, administrator, trustee, 19conservator, or other representative appointed by order of any 20court.21    "Pipe tobacco" means any tobacco that, because of its 22appearance, type, packaging, or labeling, is suitable for use 23in a pipe and is likely to be offered to or purchased by a 24consumer as tobacco to be smoked in a pipe. 25    "Place of business" means and includes any place where 26tobacco products are sold or where tobacco products are   SB1314- 7 -LRB104 07123 HLH 17160 b1manufactured, stored, or kept for the purpose of sale or 2consumption, including any vessel, vehicle, airplane, train, 3or vending machine.4    "Prior continuous compliance taxpayer" means any person 5who is licensed under this Act and who, having been a licensee 6for a continuous period of 2 years, is determined by the 7Department not to have been either delinquent or deficient in 8the payment of tax liability during that period or otherwise 9in violation of this Act. "Prior continuous compliance 10taxpayer" also means any taxpayer who has, as verified by the 11Department, continuously complied with the condition of his 12bond or other security under provisions of this Act for a 13period of 2 consecutive years. In calculating the consecutive 14period of time described in this definition for qualification 15as a prior continuous compliance taxpayer, a consecutive 16period of time of qualifying compliance immediately prior to 17the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 103rd General 18Assembly shall be credited to any licensee who became licensed 19on or before the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 20103rd General Assembly. A distributor that is a prior 21continuous compliance taxpayer and becomes a successor to a 22distributor as the result of an acquisition, merger, or 23consolidation of that distributor shall be deemed to be a 24prior continuous compliance taxpayer with respect to the 25acquired, merged, or consolidated entity. 26    "Remote retail sale" means a sale by a remote retail   SB1314- 8 -LRB104 07123 HLH 17160 b1seller of cigars or pipe tobacco to a consumer in this State 2when:3        (1) the buyer submits the order for the sale by means 4    of a telephone or other method of voice transmission, by 5    first class mail, or by using the Internet or other online 6    service, or if the seller is otherwise not in the physical 7    presence of the buyer when the request for purchase or 8    order is made; or9        (2) the cigars or pipe tobacco are delivered to the 10    buyer by common carrier, private delivery service, or 11    other method of remote delivery, or the seller is not in 12    the physical presence of the buyer when the buyer obtains 13    possession of the cigars or pipe tobacco.14    "Remote retail seller" means a person located outside of 15this State who makes remote retail sales of cigars or pipe 16tobacco, so long as that person does not maintain within this 17State, directly or by a subsidiary, an office, distribution 18house, sales house, warehouse, or other place of business, or 19any agent or other representative operating within this State 20under the authority of the person or its subsidiary, 21irrespective of whether the place of business or the agent is 22located here permanently or temporarily or whether the person 23or subsidiary is licensed to do business in this State. 24    "Retailer" means any person in this State engaged in the 25business of selling tobacco products to consumers in this 26State, regardless of quantity or number of sales.  SB1314- 9 -LRB104 07123 HLH 17160 b1    "Sale" means any transfer, exchange, or barter in any 2manner or by any means whatsoever for a consideration and 3includes all sales made by persons.4    "Stamp" or "stamps" mean the indicia required to be 5affixed on a package of little cigars that evidence payment of 6the tax on packages of little cigars containing 20 or 25 little 7cigars under Section 10-10 of this Act. These stamps shall be 8the same stamps used for cigarettes under the Cigarette Tax 9Act. 10    "Stamping distributor" means a distributor licensed under 11this Act and also licensed as a distributor under the 12Cigarette Tax Act or Cigarette Use Tax Act. 13    "Stock keeping unit" or "SKU" means the unique identifier 14assigned by a manufacturer, distributor, or remote retail 15seller to various tobacco products in order to track 16inventory. 17    "Tobacco products" means any cigars, including little 18cigars; cheroots; stogies; periques; granulated, plug cut, 19crimp cut, ready rubbed, and other smoking tobacco; snuff 20(including moist snuff) or snuff flour; cavendish; plug and 21twist tobacco; fine-cut and other chewing tobaccos; shorts; 22refuse scraps, clippings, cuttings, and sweeping of tobacco; 23and other kinds and forms of tobacco, prepared in such manner 24as to be suitable for chewing or smoking in a pipe or 25otherwise, or both for chewing and smoking; but does not 26include cigarettes as defined in Section 1 of the Cigarette   SB1314- 10 -LRB104 07123 HLH 17160 b1Tax Act or tobacco purchased for the manufacture of cigarettes 2by cigarette distributors and manufacturers defined in the 3Cigarette Tax Act and persons who make, manufacture, or 4fabricate cigarettes as a part of a Correctional Industries 5program for sale to residents incarcerated in penal 6institutions or resident patients of a State operated mental 7health facility.8    Beginning on July 1, 2019, "tobacco products" also 9includes electronic cigarettes. 10    "Wholesale price" means the established list price for 11which a manufacturer sells tobacco products to a distributor, 12before the allowance of any discount, trade allowance, rebate, 13or other reduction. In the absence of such an established list 14price, the manufacturer's invoice price at which the 15manufacturer sells the tobacco product to unaffiliated 16distributors, before any discounts, trade allowances, rebates, 17or other reductions, shall be presumed to be the wholesale 18price.19    "Wholesaler" means any person, wherever resident or 20located, engaged in the business of selling tobacco products 21to others for the purpose of resale. "Wholesaler", when used 22in this Act, does not include a person licensed as a 23distributor under Section 10-20 of this Act unless expressly 24stated in this Act. 25(Source: P.A. 102-40, eff. 6-25-21; 103-1001, eff. 8-9-24.)   SB1314- 11 -LRB104 07123 HLH 17160 b1    (35 ILCS 143/10-10)2    Sec. 10-10. Tax imposed. 3    (a) Except as otherwise provided in this Section with 4respect to little cigars, on the first day of the third month 5after the month in which this Act becomes law, a tax is imposed 6on any person engaged in business as a distributor of tobacco 7products, as defined in Section 10-5, at the rate of: 8            (1) (i) 18% of the wholesale price of tobacco 9    products sold or otherwise disposed of to retailers or 10    consumers located in this State prior to July 1, 2012; 11            (2) and (ii) 36% of the wholesale price of tobacco 12    products sold or otherwise disposed of to retailers or 13    consumers located in this State beginning on July 1, 2012 14    and before January 1, 2026; and15            (3) beginning on January 1, 2026, 36% of:16                (A) the actual cost paid by a distributor or 17        remote retail seller for the stock keeping unit sold 18        or otherwise disposed of to a retailer or consumer in 19        the State; or20                (B) if documentation of the actual cost paid 21        by a distributor or remote retail seller is not 22        available due to matters beyond the distributor or 23        remote retail seller's control, the actual cost list 24        paid by a distributor or remote retail seller for the 25        stock keeping unit sold or otherwise disposed of to 26        retailers or consumers located in this State for which   SB1314- 12 -LRB104 07123 HLH 17160 b1        documentation is not available. ; except that, 2        beginning 3    Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection (a), 4beginning on January 1, 2013, the tax on moist snuff shall be 5imposed at a rate of $0.30 per ounce, and a proportionate tax 6at the like rate on all fractional parts of an ounce, sold or 7otherwise disposed of to retailers or consumers located in 8this State. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a), 9beginning on ; and except that, beginning July 1, 2019, the tax 10on electronic cigarettes shall be imposed at the rate of 15% of 11the wholesale price of electronic cigarettes sold or otherwise 12disposed of to retailers or consumers located in this State. 13    The tax imposed under this subsection (a) is in addition 14to all other occupation or privilege taxes imposed by the 15State of Illinois, by any political subdivision thereof, or by 16any municipal corporation. However, the tax is not imposed 17upon any activity in that business in interstate commerce or 18otherwise, to the extent to which that activity may not, under 19the Constitution and Statutes of the United States, be made 20the subject of taxation by this State, and except that, 21beginning July 1, 2013, the tax on little cigars shall be 22imposed at the same rate, and the proceeds shall be 23distributed in the same manner, as the tax imposed on 24cigarettes under the Cigarette Tax Act. The tax is also not 25imposed on sales made to the United States or any entity 26thereof.  SB1314- 13 -LRB104 07123 HLH 17160 b1    If the Department determines that the actual cost list for 2a SKU is not indicative of the actual cost paid for the SKU, 3then the Department may determine the distributor's or remote 4retail seller's tax liability for the SKU based on the 5distributor's or remote retail seller's books and records or 6from information on invoices obtained from the distributor's 7or remote retail seller's suppliers.8    (a-5) Beginning January 1, 2026, the tax imposed under 9subsection (a) is also imposed upon persons who are engaged in 10business as remote retail sellers of cigars and pipe tobacco 11and who make sales to Illinois consumers on which the tax has 12not been paid by a distributor, if:13        (1) the cumulative gross receipts of the remote retail 14    seller from sales of tangible personal property to 15    consumers in this State are $100,000 or more; or16        (2) the remote retail seller enters into 200 or more 17    separate transactions for the sale of tangible personal 18    property to consumers in this State.19    A remote retail seller that meets or exceeds the threshold 20in either paragraph (1) or (2) of this subsection shall be 21liable for taxes imposed by this Act on all sales made by that 22remote retail seller of taxable products under this Act to 23Illinois consumers on which the tax has not been paid by a 24distributor.25    The remote retail seller shall determine on a quarterly 26basis, ending on the last day of March, June, September, and   SB1314- 14 -LRB104 07123 HLH 17160 b1December, whether it meets the criteria of either paragraph 2(1) or (2) of this subsection for the preceding 12-month 3period. If the remote retail seller meets the criteria of 4either paragraph (1) or (2) for a 12-month period, then the 5remote retail seller is considered to be engaged in business 6as a remote retail seller in this State and is required to 7collect and remit the tax imposed under this Act and to file 8all applicable returns for the next 12-month period. At the 9end of that 12-month period, the remote retail seller shall 10determine whether the remote retail seller met the criteria of 11either paragraph (1) or (2) for the preceding 12-month period. 12If the remote retail seller met the criteria in either 13paragraph (1) or (2) for the preceding 12-month period, the 14remote retail seller is considered to be engaged in business 15as a remote retail seller in this State and is required to 16collect and remit the tax imposed under this Act and file 17returns for the subsequent year. If, at the end of a one-year 18period, a remote retail seller that was required to collect 19and remit the tax imposed under this Act determines that the 20remote retail seller did not meet the criteria in either 21paragraph (1) or (2) during the preceding 12-month period, 22then the remote retail seller shall certify to the Department, 23in the form and manner required by the Department, that the 24remote retail seller did not meet the criteria in either 25paragraph (1) or (2) during the preceding 12-month period and 26shall subsequently determine on a quarterly basis, ending on   SB1314- 15 -LRB104 07123 HLH 17160 b1the last day of March, June, September, and December, whether 2the remote retail seller meets the criteria of either 3paragraph (1) or (2) for the preceding 12-month period. 4    (b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this Section, 5stamping distributors of packages of little cigars containing 620 or 25 little cigars sold or otherwise disposed of in this 7State shall remit the tax by purchasing tax stamps from the 8Department and affixing them to packages of little cigars in 9the same manner as stamps are purchased and affixed to 10cigarettes under the Cigarette Tax Act, unless the stamping 11distributor sells or otherwise disposes of those packages of 12little cigars to another stamping distributor. Only persons 13meeting the definition of "stamping distributor" contained in 14Section 10-5 of this Act may affix stamps to packages of little 15cigars containing 20 or 25 little cigars. Stamping 16distributors may not sell or dispose of little cigars at 17retail to consumers or users at locations where stamping 18distributors affix stamps to packages of little cigars 19containing 20 or 25 little cigars. 20    (c) The impact of the tax levied by this Act is imposed 21upon distributors engaged in the business of selling tobacco 22products to retailers or consumers in this State. Beginning 23January 1, 2026, the impact of the tax levied by this Act is 24also imposed upon remote retail sellers that meet the criteria 25in subsection (a-5) of this Section. A remote retail seller 26shall pay the tax on all sales of cigars and pipe tobacco to   SB1314- 16 -LRB104 07123 HLH 17160 b1consumers in this State on which the tax has not been paid by a 2distributor. Whenever a stamping distributor brings or causes 3to be brought into this State from without this State, or 4purchases from without or within this State, any packages of 5little cigars containing 20 or 25 little cigars upon which 6there are no tax stamps affixed as required by this Act, for 7purposes of resale or disposal in this State to a person not a 8stamping distributor, then such stamping distributor shall pay 9the tax to the Department and add the amount of the tax to the 10price of such packages sold by such stamping distributor. 11Payment of the tax shall be evidenced by a stamp or stamps 12affixed to each package of little cigars containing 20 or 25 13little cigars. 14    Stamping distributors paying the tax to the Department on 15packages of little cigars containing 20 or 25 little cigars 16sold to other distributors, wholesalers or retailers shall add 17the amount of the tax to the price of the packages of little 18cigars containing 20 or 25 little cigars sold by such stamping 19distributors. 20    (d) Beginning on January 1, 2013, the tax rate imposed per 21ounce of moist snuff may not exceed 15% of the tax imposed upon 22a package of 20 cigarettes pursuant to the Cigarette Tax Act. 23    (d-5) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Section 24to the contrary, beginning January 1, 2026 and continuing 25through December 31, 2028, the tax per cigar sold or otherwise 26disposed of shall not exceed $0.75 per cigar. This subsection   SB1314- 17 -LRB104 07123 HLH 17160 b1shall not apply to little cigars. 2    (e) All moneys received by the Department under this Act 3from sales occurring prior to July 1, 2012 shall be paid into 4the Long-Term Care Provider Fund of the State Treasury. Of the 5moneys received by the Department from sales occurring on or 6after July 1, 2012, except for moneys received from the tax 7imposed on the sale of little cigars, 50% shall be paid into 8the Long-Term Care Provider Fund and 50% shall be paid into the 9Healthcare Provider Relief Fund. Beginning July 1, 2013, all 10moneys received by the Department under this Act from the tax 11imposed on little cigars shall be distributed as provided in 12Section 2 of the Cigarette Tax Act. 13(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19.) 14    (35 ILCS 143/10-24 new)15    Sec. 10-24. Remote retail seller's license. Beginning on 16January 1, 2026, it shall be unlawful for any person who meets 17the criteria established in subsection (a-5) of Section 10-10 18to engage in business as a remote retail seller within the 19meaning of this Act without first having obtained a license to 20do so from the Department. Application for that license shall 21be made to the Department, by electronic means, in a form 22prescribed by the Department. Each applicant for a license 23shall furnish to the Department, in an electronic format 24established by the Department, the following information:25        (1) the name and address of the applicant;  SB1314- 18 -LRB104 07123 HLH 17160 b1        (2) the address of the location at which the applicant 2    proposes to engage in business as a remote retail seller 3    outside this State; and4        (3) such other additional information as the 5    Department may lawfully require by rule.6    Beginning on January 1, 2026, in addition to obtaining a 7license to engage in business as a remote retail seller in this 8State, no remote retail seller who meets the criteria 9established in subsection (a-5) of Section 10-10 may engage in 10business as a remote retail seller within the meaning of this 11Act without registering under the Retailers' Occupation Tax 12Act pursuant to Section 2a of that Act.13    A separate annual license shall be obtained for each place 14of business at which a person who is required to procure a 15remote retail seller's license under this Section proposes to 16engage in business as a remote retail seller in Illinois under 17this Act. All licenses issued by the Department under this 18Section shall be valid for a period not to exceed one year 19after issuance unless sooner revoked, canceled, or suspended 20as provided in this Act. All licenses must be renewed on an 21annual basis. An application submitted by a remote retail 22seller shall include an acknowledgement consenting to the 23jurisdiction of the Department and the courts of this State 24concerning the enforcement of this Act and any related laws, 25rules, and regulations, including authorizing the Department 26of Revenue to conduct inspections and audits for the purpose   SB1314- 19 -LRB104 07123 HLH 17160 b1of ensuring compliance with this Act and to issue penalties 2for violations of this Act.3    Each remote retail seller must perform age verification 4through an independent, third-party age verification service 5that compares information available from a commercially 6available database, or aggregate of databases, that are 7regularly used by government agencies and businesses for the 8purpose of age and identity verification to the personal 9information entered by the individual during the ordering 10process that establishes that the individual is of age.11    If the provisions of subsection (a-5) of Section 10-10 are 12met, and the tax imposed under this Act is being remitted using 13the actual cost list method to calculate the tax, each remote 14retail seller must provide the remote retail sellers's 15certified actual cost list to the Department for each SKU to be 16offered for remote retail sale in the subsequent calendar 17year. The actual cost list shall be updated by the remote 18retail seller quarterly as new SKUs are added to the remote 19retail seller's inventory. New SKUs will be added using the 20actual cost first paid for the SKU.21    The following are ineligible to receive a remote retail 22seller's license under this Act:23        (1) a person who has been convicted of a felony under 24    any federal or State law for smuggling cigarettes or 25    tobacco products or tobacco tax evasion, if the 26    Department, after investigation and a hearing if requested   SB1314- 20 -LRB104 07123 HLH 17160 b1    by the applicant, determines that such person has not been 2    sufficiently rehabilitated to warrant the public trust;3        (2) a corporation, if any officer, manager or director 4    thereof, or any stockholder or stockholders owning in the 5    aggregate more than 5% of the stock of such corporation, 6    would not be eligible to receive a license under this Act 7    for any reason; and8        (3) any person who is in default to the State of 9    Illinois for moneys due under this Act or any other tax Act 10    administered by the Department.11    The Department, upon receipt of an application, in proper 12form, from a person who is eligible to receive a remote retail 13seller's license under this Act, shall issue to such applicant 14a license in form as prescribed by the Department, which 15license shall permit the applicant to which it is issued to 16engage in business as a remote retail seller under this Act at 17the place shown in the remote retail seller's application. All 18licenses issued by the Department under this Section shall be 19valid for a period not to exceed one year after issuance unless 20sooner revoked, canceled or suspended as provided in this Act. 21No license issued under this Section is transferable or 22assignable. A person who obtains a license as a retailer who 23ceases to do business as specified in the license, or who never 24commenced business, or whose license is suspended or revoked, 25shall immediately surrender the license to the Department.26    The Department may, in its discretion, upon application,   SB1314- 21 -LRB104 07123 HLH 17160 b1authorize the payment of the tax imposed under Section 10-10 2by any remote retail seller not otherwise subject to the tax 3imposed under this Act who, to the satisfaction of the 4Department, furnishes adequate security to ensure payment of 5the tax. The remote retail seller shall be issued, without 6charge, a license to remit the tax. When so authorized, it 7shall be the duty of the remote retail seller to remit the tax 8imposed upon the actual cost or actual cost list price of the 9cigars or pipe tobacco sold or otherwise disposed of to 10consumers located in this State, in the same manner and 11subject to the same requirements as any other remote retail 12seller required to be licensed under this Act. It shall be the 13duty of the remote retail seller to remit the tax imposed upon 14the actual cost or actual cost list price of cigar or pipe 15tobacco, sold or otherwise disposed of to consumers located in 16this State, in the same manner and subject to the same 17requirements as any other remote retail seller required to be 18licensed under this Act.19    Any person aggrieved by any decision of the Department 20under this Section may, within 30 days after notice of the 21decision, protest and request a hearing. Upon receiving a 22request for a hearing, the Department shall give notice to the 23person requesting the hearing of the time and place fixed for 24the hearing and shall hold a hearing in conformity with the 25provisions of this Act and then issue its final administrative 26decision in the matter to that person. In the absence of a   SB1314- 22 -LRB104 07123 HLH 17160 b1protest and request for a hearing within 30 days, the 2Department's decision shall become final without any further 3determination being made or notice given. 4    (35 ILCS 143/10-25)5    Sec. 10-25. License actions. 6    (a) The Department may, after notice and a hearing, 7revoke, cancel, or suspend the license of any distributor, or 8retailer, or remote retail seller who violates any of the 9provisions of this Act, fails to keep books and records as 10required under this Act, fails to make books and records 11available for inspection upon demand by a duly authorized 12employee of the Department, or violates a rule or regulation 13of the Department for the administration and enforcement of 14this Act. The notice shall specify the alleged violation or 15violations upon which the revocation, cancellation, or 16suspension proceeding is based.17    (a-5) The Department may, after notice and a hearing, 18revoke, cancel, or suspend the license of a distributor or 19remote retail seller that fails to properly register and remit 20tax under the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act for all tobacco 21products that are sold to consumers in this State.22    (a-10) The Department may, after notice and a hearing, 23revoke, cancel, or suspend the license of a distributor or 24remote retail seller who is found in violation of any law, 25rule, or regulation of the state where the business is located   SB1314- 23 -LRB104 07123 HLH 17160 b1as listed on the license issued by the Department. The notice 2shall specify the alleged violation or violations upon which 3the revocation, cancellation, or suspension proceeding is 4based. 5    (b) The Department may revoke, cancel, or suspend the 6license of any distributor for a violation of the Tobacco 7Product Manufacturers' Escrow Enforcement Act as provided in 8Section 20 of that Act.9    (c) If the retailer has a training program that 10facilitates compliance with minimum-age tobacco laws, the 11Department shall suspend for 3 days the license of that 12retailer for a fourth or subsequent violation of the 13Prevention of Tobacco Use by Persons under 21 Years of Age and 14Sale and Distribution of Tobacco Products Act, as provided in 15subsection (a) of Section 2 of that Act. For the purposes of 16this Section, any violation of subsection (a) of Section 2 of 17the Prevention of Tobacco Use by Persons under 21 Years of Age 18and Sale and Distribution of Tobacco Products Act occurring at 19the retailer's licensed location, during a 24-month period, 20shall be counted as a violation against the retailer.21    If the retailer does not have a training program that 22facilitates compliance with minimum-age tobacco laws, the 23Department shall suspend for 3 days the license of that 24retailer for a second violation of the Prevention of Tobacco 25Use by Persons under 21 Years of Age and Sale and Distribution 26of Tobacco Products Act, as provided in subsection (a-5) of   SB1314- 24 -LRB104 07123 HLH 17160 b1Section 2 of that Act.2    If the retailer does not have a training program that 3facilitates compliance with minimum-age tobacco laws, the 4Department shall suspend for 7 days the license of that 5retailer for a third violation of the Prevention of Tobacco 6Use by Persons under 21 Years of Age and Sale and Distribution 7of Tobacco Products Act, as provided in subsection (a-5) of 8Section 2 of that Act.9    If the retailer does not have a training program that 10facilitates compliance with minimum-age tobacco laws, the 11Department shall suspend for 30 days the license of a retailer 12for a fourth or subsequent violation of the Prevention of 13Tobacco Use by Persons under 21 Years of Age and Sale and 14Distribution of Tobacco Products Act, as provided in 15subsection (a-5) of Section 2 of that Act. 16    A training program that facilitates compliance with 17minimum-age tobacco laws must include at least the following 18elements: (i) it must explain that only individuals displaying 19valid identification demonstrating that they are 21 years of 20age or older shall be eligible to purchase cigarettes or 21tobacco products and (ii) it must explain where a clerk can 22check identification for a date of birth. The training may be 23conducted electronically. Each retailer that has a training 24program shall require each employee who completes the training 25program to sign a form attesting that the employee has 26received and completed tobacco training. The form shall be   SB1314- 25 -LRB104 07123 HLH 17160 b1kept in the employee's file and may be used to provide proof of 2training.3    (d) The Department may, by application to any circuit 4court, obtain an injunction restraining any person who engages 5in business as a distributor or remote retail seller of 6tobacco products without a license (either because the his or 7her license has been revoked, canceled, or suspended or 8because of a failure to obtain a license in the first instance) 9from engaging in that business until that person, as if that 10person were a new applicant for a license, complies with all of 11the conditions, restrictions, and requirements of Section 1210-20 or Section 10-24 of this Act and qualifies for and 13obtains a license. Refusal or neglect to obey the order of the 14court may result in punishment for contempt.15(Source: P.A. 100-940, eff. 8-17-18; 101-2, eff. 7-1-19.) 16    (35 ILCS 143/10-30)17    Sec. 10-30. Returns. 18    (a) Every distributor shall, on or before the 15th day of 19each month, file a return with the Department covering the 20preceding calendar month. The return shall disclose the 21wholesale price, or beginning on January 1, 2026, the actual 22cost or actual cost list price, for all tobacco products other 23than electronic cigarettes, little cigars, or moist snuff and 24the quantity in ounces of moist snuff sold or otherwise 25disposed of and other information that the Department may   SB1314- 26 -LRB104 07123 HLH 17160 b1reasonably require. Information that the Department may 2reasonably require includes information related to the uniform 3regulation and taxation of tobacco products. The return shall 4be filed upon a form prescribed and furnished by the 5Department.6    (a-5) Beginning February 1, 2026, every remote retail 7seller shall, on or before the 15th day of each month, file a 8return with the Department covering the preceding calendar 9month. The remote retail seller's return must report all 10cigars or pipe tobacco brought in or caused to be brought in 11from outside the State or shipped or transported to consumers 12within the State during the preceding calendar month. The 13return must include further information as the Department may 14prescribe and must show the total actual cost or actual cost 15list price paid by a remote retail seller for a stock keeping 16unit for the previous calendar month. The return must show the 17amount of tax due for all remote retail sales made from outside 18the State, to a consumer within the State during the preceding 19calendar month. It is the intent and purpose of this 20amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly that the remote 21retail seller remit the tax at the time the return is filed. It 22is further the intent and purpose of this amendatory Act of the 23104th General Assembly to impose the tax under this Act only 24once on all tobacco products, including cigars and pipe 25tobacco, sold in the State. 26    (b) In addition to the information required under   SB1314- 27 -LRB104 07123 HLH 17160 b1subsection (a), on or before the 15th day of each month, 2covering the preceding calendar month, each stamping 3distributor shall, on forms prescribed and furnished by the 4Department, report the quantity of little cigars sold or 5otherwise disposed of, including the number of packages of 6little cigars sold or disposed of during the month containing 720 or 25 little cigars. 8    (c) At the time when any return of any distributor or 9remote retail seller is due to be filed with the Department, 10the distributor shall also remit to the Department the tax 11liability that the distributor or remote retail seller has 12incurred for transactions occurring in the preceding calendar 13month. Starting January 1, 2026, the distributor or remote 14remote retail seller shall remit the tax liability, less a 15discount of 1.75%, not to exceed $1,000 per month, which is 16allowed to reimburse the distributor or remote retail seller 17for the expenses incurred in keeping records, preparing and 18filing returns, remitting the tax, and supplying data to the 19Department on request. No discount may be claimed by a 20taxpayer on returns not timely filed and for taxes not timely 21remitted. No discount may be claimed by a taxpayer for any 22return that is not filed electronically. 23    (d) The Department may adopt rules to require the 24electronic filing of any return or document required to be 25filed under this Act. Those rules may provide for exceptions 26from the filing requirement set forth in this paragraph for   SB1314- 28 -LRB104 07123 HLH 17160 b1persons who demonstrate that they do not have access to the 2Internet and petition the Department to waive the electronic 3filing requirement. 4    (e) If any payment provided for in this Section exceeds 5the distributor's liabilities under this Act, as shown on an 6original return, the distributor may credit such excess 7payment against liability subsequently to be remitted to the 8Department under this Act, in accordance with reasonable rules 9adopted by the Department. 10(Source: P.A. 103-592, eff. 1-1-25.) 11    (35 ILCS 143/10-35)12    Sec. 10-35. Record keeping. 13    (a) Every distributor, as defined in Section 10-5, shall 14keep complete and accurate records of tobacco products held, 15purchased, manufactured, brought in or caused to be brought in 16from without the State, and tobacco products sold, or 17otherwise disposed of, and shall preserve and keep all 18invoices, bills of lading, sales records, and copies of bills 19of sale, the wholesale price, and beginning January 1, 2026 20the actual cost or actual cost list price for tobacco products 21sold or otherwise disposed of, an inventory of tobacco 22products prepared as of December 31 of each year or as of the 23last day of the distributor's fiscal year if the distributor 24he or she files federal income tax returns on the basis of a 25fiscal year, and other pertinent papers and documents relating   SB1314- 29 -LRB104 07123 HLH 17160 b1to the manufacture, purchase, sale, or disposition of tobacco 2products. Every sales invoice issued by a licensed distributor 3to a retailer in this State shall contain the distributor's 4Tobacco Products License number unless the distributor has 5been granted a waiver by the Department in response to a 6written request in cases where (i) the distributor sells 7little cigars or other tobacco products only to licensed 8retailers that are wholly-owned by the distributor or owned by 9a wholly-owned subsidiary of the distributor; (ii) the 10licensed retailer obtains little cigars or other tobacco 11products only from the distributor requesting the waiver; and 12(iii) the distributor affixes the tax stamps to the original 13packages of little cigars or has or will pay the tax on the 14other tobacco products sold to the licensed retailer. The 15distributor shall file a written request with the Department, 16and, if the Department determines that the distributor meets 17the conditions for a waiver, the Department shall grant the 18waiver. 19    (b) Every retailer, as defined in Section 10-5, whether or 20not the retailer has obtained a retailer's license pursuant to 21Section 4g, shall keep complete and accurate records of 22tobacco products held, purchased, sold, or otherwise disposed 23of, and shall preserve and keep all invoices, bills of lading, 24sales records, and copies of bills of sale, returns and other 25pertinent papers and documents relating to the purchase, sale, 26or disposition of tobacco products. Such records need not be   SB1314- 30 -LRB104 07123 HLH 17160 b1maintained on the licensed premises, but must be maintained in 2the State of Illinois; however, if access is available 3electronically, the records may be maintained out of state. 4However, all original invoices or copies thereof covering 5purchases of tobacco products must be retained on the licensed 6premises for a period of 90 days after such purchase, unless 7the Department has granted a waiver in response to a written 8request in cases where records are kept at a central business 9location within the State of Illinois or in cases where 10records that are available electronically are maintained out 11of state. The Department shall adopt rules regarding the 12eligibility for a waiver, revocation of a waiver, and 13requirements and standards for maintenance and accessibility 14of records located at a central location out-of-State pursuant 15to a waiver provided under this Section.16    (b-5) Every remote retail seller, as defined in Section 1710-5 shall keep complete and accurate records of tobacco 18products held, purchased, sold, or otherwise disposed of and 19shall preserve and keep all invoices, bills of lading, sales 20records, and copies of bills of sale, returns and other 21pertinent papers and documents relating to the purchase, sale, 22or disposition of tobacco products. Such records must be on 23the remote retail seller's premises but need not be maintained 24in the State of Illinois; however, remote retail sellers shall 25also provide access electronically. However, all original 26invoices or copies thereof covering purchases of tobacco   SB1314- 31 -LRB104 07123 HLH 17160 b1products must be retained on the remote retail seller's 2premises until the expiration of the period with respect to 3which the Department is authorized to issue a notice of tax 4liability. 5    (c) Books, records, papers, and documents that are 6required by this Act to be kept shall, at all times during the 7usual business hours of the day, be subject to inspection by 8the Department or its duly authorized agents and employees. 9The books, records, papers, and documents for any period with 10respect to which the Department is authorized to issue a 11notice of tax liability shall be preserved until the 12expiration of that period.13(Source: P.A. 99-192, eff. 1-1-16; 100-940, eff. 8-17-18.) 14    (35 ILCS 143/10-37)15    Sec. 10-37. Proof of payment of tax imposed by this Act. 16Every licensed distributor of tobacco products in this State 17is required to show proof of the tax having been paid as 18required by this Act by displaying its Tobacco Products 19License number on every sales invoice issued to a retailer in 20this State. Every licensed remote retail seller of tobacco 21products in this State is required to show proof of the tax 22having been paid as required by this Act by displaying its 23Tobacco Products License number on every sales invoice issued 24to a consumer in this State. No retailer shall possess tobacco 25products without either a proper invoice indicating that the   SB1314- 32 -LRB104 07123 HLH 17160 b1tobacco products tax was paid by a distributor for the tobacco 2products in the retailer's possession or other proof that the 3tax was paid by the retailer if it has purchased tobacco 4products on which tax has not been paid as required by this 5Act. Failure to comply with the provisions of this paragraph 6may be grounds for revocation of a distributor's, remote 7retail seller's, or retailer's license in accordance with 8Section 10-25 of this Act or Section 6 of the Cigarette Tax 9Act. In addition, the Department may impose a civil penalty 10not to exceed $1,000 for the first violation and $3,000 for 11each subsequent violation, which shall be deposited into the 12Tax Compliance and Administration Fund.13(Source: P.A. 100-940, eff. 8-17-18.) 14    (35 ILCS 143/10-38)15    Sec. 10-38. Presumption for unlicensed distributors, 16remote retail sellers, or persons. Whenever any person obtains 17tobacco products from an unlicensed in-state or out-of-state 18distributor, remote retail seller, or person, a prima facie 19presumption shall arise that the tax imposed by this Act on 20such tobacco products has not been paid in violation of this 21Act. Invoices or other documents kept in the normal course of 22business in the possession of a person reflecting purchases of 23tobacco products from an unlicensed in-state or out-of-state 24distributor, remote retail seller, or person or invoices or 25other documents kept in the normal course of business obtained   SB1314- 33 -LRB104 07123 HLH 17160 b1by the Department from in-state or out-of-state distributors, 2remote retail sellers, or persons, are sufficient to raise the 3presumption that the tax imposed by this Act has not been paid. 4If a presumption is raised, the Department may assess tax, 5penalty, and interest on the tobacco products. In addition, 6any person who violates this Section is liable to pay to the 7Department, for deposit in the Tax Compliance and 8Administration Fund, a penalty of $1,000 for the first 9violation and $3,000 for any subsequent violation. The 10Department may adopt rules to administer the penalties under 11this Section.12(Source: P.A. 100-940, eff. 8-17-18.) 13    (35 ILCS 143/10-45)14    Sec. 10-45. Incorporation by reference. All of the 15provisions of Sections 4, 5, 5a, 5b, 5c, 5d, 5e, 5f, 5g, 5h, 165i, 5j, 6, 6a, 6b, 6c, 8, 9, 10, 11, 11a, and 12 of the 17Retailers' Occupation Tax Act, and all applicable provisions 18of the Uniform Penalty and Interest Act that are not 19inconsistent with this Act, apply to distributors and remote 20retail sellers of tobacco products to the same extent as if 21those provisions were included in this Act. References in the 22incorporated Sections of the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act to 23retailers, to sellers, or to persons engaged in the business 24of selling tangible personal property mean distributors or 25remote retail sellers when used in this Act. References in the   SB1314- 34 -LRB104 07123 HLH 17160 b1incorporated Sections to sales of tangible personal property 2mean sales of tobacco products when used in this Act.3    All of the provisions of Sections 7, 8, 8a, 16, 18a, 18b, 418c, 22, 23, 24, 26, 27, and 28a of the Cigarette Tax Act which 5are not inconsistent with this Act shall apply, as far as 6practicable, to the subject matter of this Act to the same 7extent as if those provisions were included in this Act. 8References in the incorporated Sections to sales of cigarettes 9mean sales of little cigars in packages of 20 or 25 little 10cigars. 11(Source: P.A. 98-273, eff. 8-9-13.) 12    (35 ILCS 143/10-50)13    Sec. 10-50. Violations and penalties. When the amount due 14is under $300, any distributor or remote retail seller who 15fails to file a return, willfully fails or refuses to make any 16payment to the Department of the tax imposed by this Act, or 17files a fraudulent return, or any officer or agent of a 18corporation engaged in the business of distributing or 19engaging in remote retail sales of tobacco products to 20retailers or and consumers located in this State who signs a 21fraudulent return filed on behalf of the corporation, or any 22accountant or other agent who knowingly enters false 23information on the return of any taxpayer under this Act is 24guilty of a Class 4 felony.25    Any person who violates any provision of Section 10-20,   SB1314- 35 -LRB104 07123 HLH 17160 b110-21, or 10-22, or 10-24 of this Act, fails to keep books and 2records as required under this Act, or willfully violates a 3rule or regulation of the Department for the administration 4and enforcement of this Act is guilty of a Class 4 felony. A 5person commits a separate offense on each day that he or she 6engages in business in violation of Section 10-20, 10-21, or 710-22, or 10-24 of this Act. If a person fails to produce the 8books and records for inspection by the Department upon 9request, a prima facie presumption shall arise that the person 10has failed to keep books and records as required under this 11Act. A person who is unable to rebut this presumption is in 12violation of this Act and is subject to the penalties provided 13in this Section. 14    When the amount due is under $300, any person who accepts 15money that is due to the Department under this Act from a 16taxpayer for the purpose of acting as the taxpayer's agent to 17make the payment to the Department, but who fails to remit the 18payment to the Department when due, is guilty of a Class 4 19felony.20    Any person who violates any provision of Sections 10-20, 2110-21 and 10-22 of this Act, fails to keep books and records as 22required under this Act, or willfully violates a rule or 23regulation of the Department for the administration and 24enforcement of this Act is guilty of a business offense and may 25be fined up to $5,000. If a person fails to produce books and 26records for inspection by the Department upon request, a prima   SB1314- 36 -LRB104 07123 HLH 17160 b1facie presumption shall arise that the person has failed to 2keep books and records as required under this Act. A person who 3is unable to rebut this presumption is in violation of this Act 4and is subject to the penalties provided in this Section. A 5person commits a separate offense on each day that he or she 6engages in business in violation of Sections 10-20, 10-21 and 710-22 of this Act. 8    When the amount due is $300 or more, any distributor or 9remote retail seller who files, or causes to be filed, a 10fraudulent return, or any officer or agent of a corporation 11engaged in the business of distributing or engaging in remote 12retail sales of tobacco products to retailers or and consumers 13located in this State who files or causes to be filed or signs 14or causes to be signed a fraudulent return filed on behalf of 15the corporation, or any accountant or other agent who 16knowingly enters false information on the return of any 17taxpayer under this Act is guilty of a Class 3 felony.18    When the amount due is $300 or more, any person engaged in 19the business of distributing or engaging in remote retail 20sales of tobacco products to retailers or and consumers 21located in this State who fails to file a return, willfully 22fails or refuses to make any payment to the Department of the 23tax imposed by this Act, or accepts money that is due to the 24Department under this Act from a taxpayer for the purpose of 25acting as the taxpayer's agent to make payment to the 26Department but fails to remit such payment to the Department   SB1314- 37 -LRB104 07123 HLH 17160 b1when due is guilty of a Class 3 felony.2    When the amount due is under $300, any retailer who fails 3to file a return, willfully fails or refuses to make any 4payment to the Department of the tax imposed by this Act, or 5files a fraudulent return, or any officer or agent of a 6corporation engaged in the retail business of selling tobacco 7products to purchasers of tobacco products for use and 8consumption located in this State who signs a fraudulent 9return filed on behalf of the corporation, or any accountant 10or other agent who knowingly enters false information on the 11return of any taxpayer under this Act is guilty of a Class A 12misdemeanor for a first offense and a Class 4 felony for each 13subsequent offense. 14    When the amount due is $300 or more, any retailer who fails 15to file a return, willfully fails or refuses to make any 16payment to the Department of the tax imposed by this Act, or 17files a fraudulent return, or any officer or agent of a 18corporation engaged in the retail business of selling tobacco 19products to purchasers of tobacco products for use and 20consumption located in this State who signs a fraudulent 21return filed on behalf of the corporation, or any accountant 22or other agent who knowingly enters false information on the 23return of any taxpayer under this Act is guilty of a Class 4 24felony. 25    Any person whose principal place of business is in this 26State and who is charged with a violation under this Section   SB1314- 38 -LRB104 07123 HLH 17160 b1shall be tried in the county where his or her principal place 2of business is located unless he or she asserts a right to be 3tried in another venue. If the taxpayer does not have his or 4her principal place of business in this State, however, the 5hearing must be held in Sangamon County unless the taxpayer 6asserts a right to be tried in another venue.7    Any taxpayer or agent of a taxpayer who with the intent to 8defraud purports to make a payment due to the Department by 9issuing or delivering a check or other order upon a real or 10fictitious depository for the payment of money, knowing that 11it will not be paid by the depository, is guilty of a deceptive 12practice in violation of Section 17-1 of the Criminal Code of 132012.14    A prosecution for a violation described in this Section 15may be commenced within 3 years after the commission of the act 16constituting the violation.17(Source: P.A. 100-201, eff. 8-18-17; 100-940, eff. 8-17-18.) 18    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 191, 2026.